Utah statutes.
78B-5-412.   Temporarily determining the United States dollar value of
foreign-money claims for limited purposes.
(1)  For the limited purpose of facilitating the enforcement of provisional
remedies in an action:
(a)  the value in United States dollars of assets to be seized or restrained
pursuant to a writ of attachment, garnishment, execution, or other legal
process;
(b)  the amount of United States dollars at issue for assessing costs; or
(c)  the amount of United States dollars involved for a surety bond or other
court-required undertaking shall be ascertained as provided in Subsections (2)
and (3).
(2)  The party seeking the process, costs, bond, or other undertaking shall
compute the dollar amount of the foreign money claimed from a bank-offered
spot rate of exchange prevailing at or near the close of business on the
banking day next preceding the filing of a request or application for the
issuance of process or for the determination of costs, or an application for a
bond or other court-required undertaking.
(3)  The party seeking the process, costs, bond, or other undertaking shall
file with each request or application an affidavit or certificate executed in
good faith by its counsel or a bank officer, stating the market quotation
used, how obtained, and setting forth the calculation.  Affected court
officials incur no liability, after a filing of the affidavit or certificate,
for acting as if the judgment was in the amount of United States dollars
stated in the affidavit or certificate.
(4)  Computations under this section are for the limited purposes of this
section and do not affect computation of the United States dollar equivalent
of the money of the judgment for payment purposes.
